dictionaries/bb-BK.aff
# Affix file Babyish Dictionary for Mozilla
# Copyright (c) 2007-2015, Tom K. C. Chiu
# Built from scratch. Released under the GNU General Public License
# Please see README.txt and license.txt for further information.
#
# R 0.2.49.20150501, 2015-05-01
# R36:
# 1. Fiksen sùffiks 'd' dè difaineiçion: -çion(s)
# 2. Ädd c / k konvörçion
# 3. Ädd -ed / -en konvörçion
# R37:
# 1. Dùplikeiten koud rīpleisen
# 2. Ädd kondiçion when wörd ended wiŧ "-ùp" & "-on"
# R39:
# 1. Ädd -èn / -àn + -ik --> -enik / -änik
# 2.
# R40:
# R41:
# R42:
# 1. Ädd trans- 
# R44:
# 1. Updeit ruls akkording tu Svendish 
# 2. Ädd REP kv --> kw
# R46:
# 1. Riordèr haih praioriti REP tu top.
# R47:
# 1. Ädd REP er/èr/ā
# R48:
# 1. Ädd REP ción --> çion
# R49:
# 1. Modifai -lènd + -ik/-iš dè biheivior
# 2. Ädd -ais + -çion --> -eiçion
#
SET UTF-8

# Modified TRY sequence based on .aff generated from raw wordlist, created through wordlist2hunspell
TRY iensortkaldpmäufbyvgjwš hç-zcSTMPAGHBLYKDINxJF­R.OáWUEìqVXC1QZ328ā976540èž'öèùàüāīōŧŋéóǐđẑčŝ

WORDCHARS -0123456789.:

BREAK 5
BREAK --
BREAK ─
BREAK -
BREAK .$
BREAK :

# The following copied directly from Swedish until Mapping
NOSUGGEST !

FORBIDDENWORD %

NEEDAFFIX ¤

# At least this many letters in each word within a compound:
COMPOUNDMIN 3

# Only two, three or four word compounds:
#COMPOUNDWORDMAX 4

# Disallow triple letters, like "fall"+"lucka":
CHECKCOMPOUNDTRIPLE
# Convert triple letters to double in compounds,
# e.g. "fall"+"lucka" = "fallucka":
SIMPLIFIEDTRIPLE
# Disallow word duplication in compounds, like "bil"+"bil":
CHECKCOMPOUNDDUP

# The generated compound word suggestions are sometimes
# very useful. At other times, they make users go crazy with
# dismay since the generated words make no sense.
MAXCPDSUGS 0

# Users get distracted by too wild suggestions
MAXDIFF 5
ONLYMAXDIFF

## This is a must for Swedish:
#NOSPLITSUGS

# Shall leave this one on
FULLSTRIP
#
#FORCEUCASE c
## Don't allow autogenerated compounds that are very similar
## to some word in the dictionary:
#CHECKCOMPOUNDREP
## For suffixes used to create first part of a compound
#COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG W
## May appear first in compound words:
#COMPOUNDBEGIN X
## May be middle elements in compound words:
#COMPOUNDMIDDLE U
## May appear last in compound words:
#COMPOUNDEND Y
## Non-word that may be part of a compund:
#ONLYINCOMPOUND Z
## copying ended

MAP 86
MAP Aa
MAP Āā
MAP Áá
MAP Ǎǎ
MAP Àà
MAP Ää
MAP Ǟǟ
MAP Ä́ä́
MAP Ä̌ä̌
MAP Ä̀ä̀
MAP Bb
MAP Cc
MAP Çç
MAP Čč
MAP Ĉĉ
MAP Dd
MAP Đđ
MAP Ee
MAP Ēē
MAP Éé
MAP Ěě
MAP Èè
MAP Ff
MAP Gg
MAP Ĝĝ
MAP Hh
MAP Ĥĥ
MAP Ii
MAP Īī
MAP Íí
MAP Ǐǐ
MAP Ìì
MAP Jj
MAP Kk
MAP Ll
MAP Mm
MAP M̄m̄
MAP Ḿḿ
MAP M̌m̌
MAP M̀m̀
MAP Nn
MAP N̄n̄
MAP Ńń
MAP Ňň
MAP Ǹǹ
MAP Ŋŋ
MAP Ŋ̄ŋ̄
MAP Ŋ́ŋ́
MAP Ŋ̌ŋ̌
MAP Ŋ̀ŋ̀
MAP Oo
MAP Ōō
MAP Óó
MAP Ǒǒ
MAP Òò
MAP Öö
MAP Ȫȫ
MAP Ö́ö́
MAP Ö̌ö̌
MAP Ö̀ö̀
MAP Pp
MAP Qq
MAP Rr
MAP Řř
MAP Ss
MAP Šš
MAP Ŝŝ
MAP Tt
MAP Ŧŧ
MAP Uu
MAP Ūū
MAP Úú
MAP Ǔǔ
MAP Ùù
MAP Üü
MAP Ǖǖ
MAP Ǘǘ
MAP Ǚǚ
MAP Ǜǜ
MAP Vv
MAP Ww
MAP Xx
MAP Yy
MAP Zz
MAP Žž
MAP Ẑẑ

# For abbreviations and words requiring a hyphen 
# When andraord in compositions, e.g. TV (Pay-TV). 
#PFX a Y 1 
#PFX a 0 - / WY.

PFX 3 Y 1
PFX 3 0 kon .

PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4 0 pro .

PFX 6 Y 1
PFX 6 0 mal .

PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 mis .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 ovèr .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C 0 undèr .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D 0 rī .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 pri .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F 0 post .

PFX G Y 1
PFX G 0 híu .

PFX H Y 1
PFX H 0 inter .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I 0 intra .

PFX J Y 1
PFX J 0 ikstra .

PFX K Y 2
PFX K 0 mǐ [^i]
PFX K 0 mǐ- i

PFX L Y 1
PFX L 0 but .

PFX M Y 1
PFX M 0 trans .

PFX N Y 1
PFX N 0 pan .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O 0 out .

PFX P Y 3
PFX P 0 supā .
PFX P 0 hàipā .
PFX P 0 ulutora .

PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q 0 dis .

SFX R Y 2
SFX R 0 àns [^aäā]
SFX R 0 -àns aäā

PFX S Y 1
PFX S 0 non .

PFX T Y 1
PFX T 0 sùb .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 ùn .

SFX V Y 2
SFX V 0 ga [^g]
SFX V 0 -ga g

SFX W Y 4
SFX W 0 ùn [^aeiouäöünl]
SFX W 0 nùn [aeiouäöü]
SFX W 0 lùn l
SFX W n llùn n

PFX X Y 1
PFX X 0 di .

SFX Y Y 6
SFX Y 0 š [iīíǐì]
SFX Y 0 k [iīíǐì]
SFX Y 0 iš [^iīíǐì]
SFX Y 0 ik [^iīíǐì]
SFX Y lènd iš lènd
SFX Y lènd ik lènd

SFX Z Y 4
SFX Z y yàbol [^aeiou]y 
SFX Z y yàboliti [^aeiou]y
SFX Z 0 àbol
SFX Z 0 àboliti .

SFX 1 Y 18
SFX 1 0 ikol . 
SFX 1 er rikol er 
SFX 1 0 ikol [^e]r 
SFX 1 0 atikol [aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 ikol [^aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 tikol ma 
SFX 1 a ikol [^m]a 
SFX 1 y ikol y 
SFX 1 0 ikol [^aemry] 
SFX 1 0 ikolli . 
SFX 1 er rikolli er 
SFX 1 0 ikolli [^e]r 
SFX 1 0 atikolli [aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 ikolli [^aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 tikolli ma 
SFX 1 a ikolli [^m]a 
SFX 1 y ikolli y 
SFX 1 0 ikolli [^aemry]

SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 ùs .

SFX 7 Y 4
SFX 7 0 isùm
SFX 7 0 isùmā
SFX 7 0 isùmās
SFX 7 0 isùmik

SFX 8 Y 2
SFX 8 0 -gga g
SFX 8 0 gga [^g]

SFX a Y 2
SFX S 0 es [cçčĉqsšŝxzžẑjŧđ]
SFX S 0 s [^cçčĉqsšŝxzžẑjŧđ]

SFX b Y 9
SFX b 0 ed .
SFX b 0 en .
SFX b 0 iŋ .
SFX b -on ed-on -on
SFX b -on en-on -on
SFX b -on iŋ-on -on
SFX b -ùp ed-ùp -ùp
SFX b -ùp en-ùp -ùp
SFX b -ùp iŋ-ùp -ùp

SFX c Y 1
SFX c 0 zo .

SFX d Y 14
SFX d 0 eiçion ais
SFX d 0 eiçions ais
SFX d 0 eiçion [^bdpst]
SFX d 0 eiçions [^bdpst]
SFX d 0 içion dd
SFX d 0 içions dd
SFX d d çion [^d]d
SFX d d çions d
SFX d d pçion [bp]
SFX d d pçions [bp]
SFX d s çion s
SFX d s çions s
SFX d t çions t
SFX d t çion t

SFX e Y 1
SFX e 0 ru .

SFX f Y 5
SFX f 0 ed .
SFX f 0 en .
SFX f 0 iŋ .
SFX f 0 iŋli .
SFX f 0 iŋs .

SFX g Y 4
SFX g 0 ivli [st]
SFX g 0 iv [st]
SFX g 0 tiv [aio]
SFX g 0 tivli [aio]

SFX h Y 20
SFX h 0 eiçion [^bdpst]
SFX h 0 eiçionol [^bdpst]
SFX h 0 eiçionolli [^bdpst]
SFX h 0 eiçions [^bdpst]
SFX h d çion d
SFX h d çionol d
SFX h d çionolli d
SFX h d çions d
SFX h d pçion [bp]
SFX h d pçionol [bp]
SFX h d pçionolli [bp]
SFX h d pçions [bp]
SFX h s çionolli s
SFX h s çionol s
SFX h s çion s
SFX h s çions s
SFX h t çionolli t
SFX h t çionol t
SFX h t çions t
SFX h t çion t

SFX i Y 2
SFX i 0 ā .
SFX i 0 ās .

SFX j Y 1
SFX j 0 li .

SFX k Y 2
SFX k 0 ènt [mn]
SFX k 0 mènt [^mn]

SFX l Y 2
SFX l 0 er .
SFX l 0 est .

SFX m Y 1
SFX m 0 fol .

SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 bu .

SFX o Y 5
SFX o 0 k [iīíǐì]
SFX o 0 ik [^iīíǐì]
SFX o èn enik èn
SFX o àn änik àn
SFX o lènd ik lènd

SFX p Y 6
SFX p 0 loji .
SFX p 0 lojiā .
SFX p 0 lojiās .
SFX p 0 lojik .
SFX p 0 lojikol .
SFX p 0 lojikolli .

SFX q Y 24
SFX q 0 tais a 
SFX q 0 ais [^l]
SFX q l ilais [^aeiou]l
SFX q l ais [aeiou]l
SFX q 0 taises a 
SFX q 0 aises [^l] 
SFX q l ilaises [^aeiou]l
SFX q l aises [aeiou]l
SFX q ùm ais ùm 
SFX q 0 ais [^ù]m 
SFX q s s ais 
SFX q 0 ais [^i]s
SFX q l ilaised [^aeiou]l
SFX q l aised [aeiou]l
SFX q ùm aised ùm 
SFX q 0 aised [^ù]m 
SFX q s sed ais 
SFX q 0 aised [^i]s
SFX q l ilaisiŋ [^aeiou]l 
SFX q l aisiŋ [aeiou]l 
SFX q ùm aisiŋ ùm 
SFX q 0 aisiŋ [^ù]m 
SFX q s siŋ ais 
SFX q 0 aisiŋ [^i]s

SFX r Y 3
SFX r s ol ks
SFX r t çol t
SFX r 0 ol [^t]

SFX s Y 1
SFX s 0 sīk .

SFX t Y 1
SFX t 0 nai .

SFX u Y 1
SFX u 0 lès .

SFX v Y 1
SFX v 0 nès .

SFX w Y 9
SFX w 0 ikol . 
SFX w er rikol er 
SFX w 0 ikol [^e]r 
SFX w 0 atikol [aeiou]m 
SFX w 0 ikol [^aeiou]m 
SFX w 0 tikol ma 
SFX w a ikol [^m]a 
SFX w y ikol y 
SFX w 0 ikol [^aemry]

SFX x Y 1
SFX x 0 na .

SFX y Y 2
SFX y 0 -i [iīíǐì]
SFX y 0 i [^iīíǐì]
