dictionaries/bb-BK.dic
aborijin/7r
absolut/7
àbsorpt/dbf
ädd/fb
administār/bfhd
adopt/dbf
ador/bhdf
àdsorpt/bdf
advanteij/aQO
ädvörtais/bfik
ā/F
agrī/ObQk
aidentifaik/dh
aidià/7a
aidiàloji/i
aikon/woa
aisoleit/dbf
akademik/r
akkyureit/dfb
akses/Zab
akt/Hd
aktiveit/bXQO
àkwair/bk
alain/b
alaw/bR
alfabet/1a
älloukeit/dib
alört/vbd
Amerika/7ao
amyus/bk
analytikol/y
änimol/pa
appīred/QO
appīren/QO
appīriŋ/QO
appīr/Rb
àppoint/bk
àpproksimeit/j
àpproprieited/Q
àpproprieiten/Q
àpproprieitiŋ/Q
apprūv/QbrO
ärokondiçion/r
arränj/bk
art/aw
artist/ao
ask/bf
asobu/ec
ässept/dbfhR
assist/Rb
assort/k
astronomi/io
astro/p
ätom/o
ättempt/b
aveilàboliti/E
aveil/Z
awàken/x
Azärbayjan/oY
bàk/n
bǎk/s
balàns/U
beis/akb1o
biografi/o
bio/p
biotekno/p
bluŋ/ec
brändiŋ/a
brīk/b
bùffèr/bfa
bùg/X
butdùk/U
Byelarux/Y
čallenj/ia
čeinj/Hba
cöŋi/l
cöŋ/y
cutsài/ce
dailut/edb
dainämik/ra
dām̄/ce
dedikeit/db
dekrisiŋ/j
difain/hd
diffikolt/y
dīkrypt/bd
dilivèràbol/U
dilivèr/byU
dilivèriŋ/Ua
dinasti/a
disaid/bEFd
disain/i
disk/2a
diskòvèr/Dby
diskript/dFbaE
diskùs/dFaEb
displeis/k
distiŋguiš/bv
distrikt/Ta
divaid/bdT
divelop/bFkE
dokyumenteit/db
domein/aT
doŋbàk/n
dǒŋcan/L
doŋ/n
doŋnam/n
duklap/X
dün/y
ed/AF
ekoloji/io
employ/kU
empt/bFE
emuleit/hbd
en/AF
enhans/kb
enjīnā/p
enliŋk/b
enter/bR
eskaleit/hbdi
Espanya/Y
eŧo/p
etymo/p
fain/Xb
fäktoriwörkā/a
fäktor/ya
fämiliar/U
fämilia/U
fānčöč/e
fān/ec
fānguŋ/e
fānkéi/e
fārmako/p
fäšion/Xa
fast/Bl
fayl/4a
feim/2
feis/aH
fei/Xa
figyur/3
fiks/E
filtèr/dbi
fin/Y
fisio/p
fit/4bv
fleks/Z
flow/Bb
forkast/Bb
formät/ba
förm/b3
form/badr
formed/DM63
formen/6DM3
formiŋ/6MD3
formol/7
föt/2
fotograf/1yo
frikwènt/j
frūt/ya
fui/s
fùzzi/v
gäla/a
gāmsi/c
gāmsizo/e
gǎnkit/x
gavèrn/dRib
Gerogia/Y
gindòu/ce
ginhoŋ/X
girok/c
girokzo/e
gläd/c
graf/aow
grīt/b
grow/bZ
gùid/iRb
guo/x
haiĥ/l
hāk/s
hälŧ/y
händol/bai
Hanguk/Y
häppi/v
Hellas/oY
helŧi/l
histo/p
històrik/Er
hop/bu
horizontol/j
Ĥristian/p
ĥronikol/p
huey/L
huŋ/s
huŋsīk/x
ifekt/ga
ifektiv/v
iksčeinj/b
iksept/d
ikspir/yR
ikspört/ao
ikspresiv/v
ikspress/dhbt
ikspressiv/v
ikspres/tdbh
ikstend/bd
ikstörnol/j
ikuip/kb
impend/b
import/Rabi
indikeit/hdbi
Indonesia/oY
iŋ/FA
inhibit/i
inkorrekt/v
instoled/U
instolen/U
instoliŋ/U
intellijènt/j
interakt/e
interpreteit/d
intervent/bdh
inväd/dbf
invest/bk
isi/lj
Italia/Yo
it/M3
jidou/L
jioloji/o
Joän/x
jörnol/7
Josòn/Y
kalkyuleited/D
käns/ir
kän/xba
käp/bZ
käraktèr/a
käšol/X
kast/b
kaunt/ObQa
klämed/4
klämen/QO4
klīr/Rbjy
klof/ce
klùstèrais/bdh
kolläboreit/dgb
kollekt/bgad
kombain/bdh
kom/bB
kommands/T
kòmmòn/ilj
kompail/dDb
kompet/bR
kompress/Xbd
kondiçionol/j
konfig/EAF
konfigyur/bAdFE
konflikt/a
konnekt/bdi
konsil/bD
konstrùkçion/QO
kontinyuen/OQ
köqi/L
korrekt/bdjv
körrènt/3j
koubu/y
koudiŋ/M
kòvèr/QObDU
krediteit/db
kritik/7r
kui/x
kwaiet/yv
kwests/D
lain/O
larj/l
leitā/M
leit/l
leŋgueij/rya
les/U
levol/a
libör/drh
ligol/pty
litèreit/jd
Lituwan/Y
li/x
loud/DbU
loudiŋ/B
low/l
lǔk/s
maifan/X
Malayšia/o
männeij/bik
Māori/oY
marjinolais/hb
meintein/biR
mikroskop/owa
mis/4bQO
mi/V
monitor/ab
monoĥrom/o
most/j
mùltinaçion/r
mùltiplaik/d
mūv/byk
mūviŋ/D
mwu/Ucj
mwuzo/e
myeni/8
naçion/MHr
naçionolaiseiçion/H
naçionolais/H
naçionol/I
naçions/H
nai/t
nam/ns
Nederlènd/Y
nei/x
ŋàuàu/cb
ŋàuàuzo/e
ŋo/x
nihilisùmā/1o
niu/jl
ni/Ux
Norlènd/Y
normol/j
offis/ar
oil/y
ol/B
oltöneit/g
ordèr/QO
or/E
orgàn/7o
orijin/arhd
Ostreilia/o
òtomeit/db1o
ould/l
päin/m
pàip/a
päk/E
pǎk/ec
pär/DE
pars/bi
pend/EX
penetreit/bd
pikkapika/X
plei/QaObD
poisòn/2
polissteiçion/a
pörform/dRbk
pörspekt/ga
port/bMaD
pöspekt/g
priditömin/dkb
print/ib
prirīkwair/dh
probàbol/j
prodùkçion/D
profit/Zu
prǒjekt/idb
prospèr/2
provaid/ib
psaikailojik/r
psaiko/p
put/Ob
pyiaozo/e
pyú/c
qeŋ/s
raided/B
raiden/B
raidiŋ/B
rekommend/hdb
rijekt/bfd
rīkonfigyur/d
rīkörs/bg
rīkwair/Ekb
rīlaiàbol/U
rilijion/2a
rīmembèr/bR
rīmot/j
risàut/a
risist/bR
rīsökoleit/b
rīspekt/bg
rīspons/Za
rīvolv/hbd
rīvörçion/r
rokk/ay
rūl/ai
Rumania/Y
sàibàk/n
sài/n
sain/Xb
saiz/Db
sasil/W
seg/k
seif/l
sekt/Hd
sencrol/7
sens/i2
sensùs/a3
sepäreit/ibjv7d
set/ODTK
sets/T
sǐk/c
sǐkzo/e
simpolais/hb
simpol/lj
skil/ma
skop/o
skūl/a
smol/ly
snow/y
söčàbol/X
sökol/oyad
soluçion/D
solven/O
sörv/3dEbD
sosiol/p7
sövaiv/ibr
speçiol/xj
spelček/bi
steibol/U
steit/kda2
stif/v
stres/abm
strùkt/3b
stùdi/ab
Tairännia/o
täks/y
Tamil/Yo
ŧäŋk/bka
teik/Ab
tekn/o1
tekst/3a
tetradirekçion/r
ŧik/v
til/QOU
traied/D
traiolrùn/a
transäkçion/r
transform/hd
transleit/dib
translitereit/db
trimen/l
tropik/rT
tu/x
ùpdeit/baf
ùpgreid/bfa
ùploudiŋ/Da
uri/V
Urugwai/o
väry/bda2
värys/2d
Viětnam/oY
vörçion/Ma
vörcuolais/bdh
vörtikol/j
vös/a2
voten/X
vyçion/4D
vyu/EbDB
wagari/A
wagaru/A
wair/au
wak/c
wakzo/e
wär/6
warui/l
waru/Xy
wei/Ta
welform/bdf
wiki/Hba
wočlist/a
woŋ/s
woŋsīk/x
wrait/Bbi
yànci/X
Yehudah/7
yiu/L
yoi/l
yoŋ/t
yu/8
yùm/ec
yunik/v
yunivös/ra
yus/Zribma
zí/s
ziuru/X
ziu/xec
